Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 63. Commission and Enlistment

§ 1211.
Eligibility.

No person shall be commissioned or enlisted in the State Guard who is not a citizen of the United States or who has been expelled or dishonorably discharged from the U.S. Armed Forces or the National Guard of any state.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 62.

§ 1212.
Private organizations.

No civil organization, society, club, post, order, fraternity, association, brotherhood, body, union, league, or other combination of persons or civil group shall be enlisted in the State Guard as an organization or unit.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 63.

§ 1213.
Oath of officers commissioned.

The oath to be taken by officers commissioned in the State Guard shall be substantially in the form prescribed for officers of the National Guard, substituting the words Vermont State Guard where necessary.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 64.

§ 1214.
Term of enlistment; oath.

The term of enlistment for enlisted members of the State Guard shall be for either one year or three years and may be renewed, subject to the termination or suspension of the authority for the State Guard. The oath to be taken upon enlistment in the State Guard shall be substantially in the form prescribed for enlisted members of the National Guard, substituting the words Vermont State Guard where necessary.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 65.